Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,151
Contracts with United States; judicial approval; proceedings authorized.

The board of directors of any irrigation district heretofore or hereafter organized may, in its discretion, before or after the making of any contract with the United States or others, the levying of any assessment or the taking of any particular steps or action, commence a special proceeding in the district court of the state, in and by which the proceedings of such board and of such district leading up to or including the making of any such contract, and the validity of any of the terms thereof, the levying of any assessment or the taking of any particular steps or action, shall be judicially examined, approved and confirmed, or disapproved and disaffirmed.

Laws 1917, c. 192, § 1, p. 466;

C.S.1922, § 2951;

C.S.1929, § 46-208;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,151.

Judicial approval of contract with the United States could be obtained in special proceeding in rem. Ainsworth Irr. Dist. v. Harms, 170 Neb. 228, 102 N.W.2d 429 (1960).

Contracts with United States for supply of water for irrigation require judicial approval. Frenchman Valley Irr. Dist. v. Smith, 167 Neb. 78, 91 N.W.2d 415 (1958).

Action to confirm bonds is a special proceeding in rem. Frenchman-Cambridge Irr. Dist. v. Ferguson, 154 Neb. 20, 46 N.W.2d 692 (1951).